Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB919.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2702(c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph and subsection (d) is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 2702. Aggravated assault.* * *(c) Officers, employees, etc., enumerated.--The officers, agents, employees and other persons referred to in subsection (a) shall be as follows:* * *(40) A United States postal worker or delivery driver.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:123456789101112131415161718 "Delivery driver." An individual or a team of individuals who are employed or contracted to predominately undertake package deliveries by driving a vehicle that can legally be operated with a standard driver's license. A delivery driver may be employed by a private or public employer.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0919PN1104 - 2 - 1234567